Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.210

Subpoenas.

(1) In addition to the powers granted in chapter 18.235 RCW, the department of licensing or its authorized agent may examine or subpoena any persons, books, papers, records, data, vehicles, or metal property bearing upon the investigation or proceeding under this chapter.

(2) The persons subpoenaed may be required to testify and produce any books, papers, records, data, vehicles, or metal property that the director of licensing deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

(3) The director of the department of licensing or an authorized agent may administer an oath to the person required to testify, and a person giving false testimony after the administration of the oath is guilty of perjury in the first degree under RCW 9A.72.020.

(4)(a) Any authorized representative of the director of the department of licensing may apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in Thurston county. The application must:

(i) State that an order is sought pursuant to this subsection;

(ii) Adequately specify the records, documents, or testimony; and

(iii) Declare under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's authority.

(b) Where the application under this subsection is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law for the agency to subpoena the records or testimony.

(c) Any authorized representative of the director of the department of licensing may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this subsection without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.

(5) Any records created or produced under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2013 c 322 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: See notes following RCW 19.290.100.